District of Columbia statutes.
31-3233

Regulations.

(a)

The Commissioner shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The regulations shall include a uniform consultation referral form for use by health insurers that require enrollees or subscribers to have a written referral to receive consultation services.

(b)

The Commissioner may waive the requirements of regulations adopted under subsection (a) of this section for the use of uniform consultation referral forms for an entity that uses the forms solely for internal purposes.

History

April 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-97, § 4, 49 DCR 994

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3234.